Tennessee, session 114, SB0775.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 67-5-2501(a)(3)(A), is amended by
adding the following as a new subdivision (vi) and redesignating the existing subdivision (vi):
(vi) Ten percent (10%) of any remaining proceeds to be used to providing tax
relief for the homeowners who are elderly low-income, disabled, or a disabled veteran or
widow of a disabled veteran, pursuant to part 7 of this chapter; then
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0775
002351
- 1 -